Utah statutes.
26A-1-105.   Multicounty local health departments.

(1)  Two or more contiguous counties may unite to create and maintain a local health department by executing an agreement pursuant to the provisions of Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

(2)  Any municipalities within counties comprising a multicounty local health department shall be served by the multicounty local health department.

